Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB140.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a subclause and the section is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *(xx.1) Using algorithmic rent-setting software in setting the amount of rent to be charged, lease terms or occupancy 12345678910111213141516171819 levels for the occupancy of residential real property, including determining any change in the amount of rent to be charged for the renewed occupancy of residential and commercial real property.* * *(14) "Algorithmic rent-setting software" means as follows:(i) A system, software or process that uses computations that:(A) Uses one or more algorithms to perform calculations of data, including Statewide or local historical or contemporaneous rental prices, price changes, supply levels, occupancy rates or lease or rental contract termination and renewal dates of residential dwelling units from two or more real estate lessors or from public databases.(B) Recommends rental prices, lease terms or occupancy levels to a landlord based on the calculations of data under clause (A).(ii) The term includes any product or service that incorporates algorithmic rent-setting software.(iii) The term does not include:(A) A report that publishes periodically, but no more frequently than monthly, rental data in an aggregated and anonymous manner, but does not recommend rental prices, fees or occupancy rates or other rental contract terms for future leases.(B) A product used for the purpose of establishing rent or income limits in accordance with affordable housing program guidelines under Federal or State law or the law of a local government or other political subdivision.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0140PN1751 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930